South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3929.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 3, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-3-990.  (A) The department may maintain a canteen at all active prisons or institutions under its jurisdiction for the sale to incarcerated persons of toilet articles, candy, notions, and other sundries, and shall provide the necessary facilities, equipment, personnel, and merchandise for the canteen. The director shall specify what commodities shall be sold in the canteen. The sale prices of the articles offered for sale shall not exceed a twenty percent mark-up above the amount paid to the vendors. (B) The department shall undertake to insure against damage or loss of canteen and handicraft materials, supplies, and equipment owned by the department. (C) The canteen operations at any prison or institution referred to in this section shall be audited biennially by the Legislative Audit Council, and at the end of each intervening fiscal year, each prison or institution shall prepare a statement of operations. At least one copy of any audit report or statement of operations shall be posted at the canteen and at least one copy shall be available to incarcerated persons at the library of each prison or institution. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----